District of Columbia statutes.
7-1303.12

Court hearing required prior to commitment.

Except as provided in § 7-1303.12a, no person with an intellectual disability shall be committed to a facility under this chapter prior to the Court hearing required under this subchapter.

Mar. 3, 1979, D.C. Law 2-137, § 312, 25 DCR 5094
Oct. 17, 2002, D.C. Law 14-199, § 2(g), 49 DCR 7647
Apr. 24, 2007, D.C. Law 16-305, § 26(h), 53 DCR 6198
Sept. 26, 2012, D.C. Law 19-169, § 17(o), 59 DCR 5567
1981 Ed., § 6-1932.
1973 Ed., § 6-1665.
D.C. Law 14-199 substituted “Except as provided in § 7-1303.12a, no” for “No”.
D.C. Law 16-305 substituted “person with mental retardation” for “mentally retarded person”.
The 2012 amendment by D.C. Law 19-169 substituted “an intellectual disability” for “mental retardation.”
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 2(g) of Civil Commitment of Citizens with Mental Retardation Emergency Amendment Act of 2002 (D.C. Act 14-383, June 12, 2002, 49 DCR 5701).
For temporary (90 day) addition of § 7-1303.12a, see § 2(h) of Civil Commitment of Citizens with Mental Retardation Emergency Amendment Act of 2002 (D.C. Act 14-383, June 12, 2002, 49 DCR 5701).
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 2(g) of Civil Commitment of Citizens with Mental Retardation Legislative Review Emergency Amendment Act of 2002 (D.C. Act 14-454, July 23, 2002, 49 DCR 8096).
For temporary (90 day) addition of § 7-1303.12a, see § 2(h) of Civil Commitment of Citizens with Mental Retardation Legislative Review Emergency Amendment Act of 2002 (D.C. Act 14-454, July 23, 2002, 49 DCR 8096).
Section 35 of D.C. Law 19-169 provided that no provision of the act shall impair any right or obligation existing under law.